Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.100

Duty to refer medical cases.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

An occupational therapist shall, after evaluating a patient and if the case is a medical one, refer the case to a physician for appropriate medical direction if such direction is lacking. Treatment by an occupational therapist of such a medical case may take place only upon the referral of a physician, osteopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon, naturopath, chiropractor, physician assistant, psychologist, optometrist, or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to practice in this state.

[2015 c 10 s 1; 1999 c 333 s 3; 1986 c 259 s 101; 1984 c 9 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Savings—1986 c 259 ss 101, 103: "The repeal of RCW 18.59.030 and 18.59.200 and the amendment of RCW 18.59.100 by this act shall not be construed as affecting any rights and duties which matured, penalties which were incurred, and proceedings which were begun before June 11, 1986." [1986 c 259 s 104.]

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.